Washington statutes.
RCW 18.35.290

Delegation to assistive personnel—Assistant duties.

A speech-language pathology assistant may only perform procedures or tasks delegated by the speech-language pathologist and must follow the individualized education program or treatment plan. Speech-language pathology assistants may not perform procedures or tasks that require diagnosis, evaluation, or clinical interpretation.

[ 2009 c 301 s 10.]

NOTES:

Intent—Implementation—2009 c 301: See notes following RCW 18.35.010.

Speech-language pathology assistants—Certification requirements—2009 c 301: See note following RCW 18.35.040.